Florida, session 2026, HB5205.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
10
11 Section 1. Subsections (4) and (5) of section 121.71,
12 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
13 121.71 Uniform rates; process; calculations; levy.—
14 (4) Required employer retirement contribution rates for
15 each membership class and subclass of the Florida Retirement
16 System for both retirement plans are as follows:
17
Percentage of
Gross
Compensation,
Effective
Membership Class July 1, 2026 2025
18
19
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5205-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5205 2026
Regular Class 7.11% 7.10%
20
Special Risk Class 19.93% 20.10%
21
Special Risk
Administrative
Support Class 10.85% 10.88%
22
Elected Officers' Class—
Legislators, Governor,
Lt. Governor,
Cabinet Officers,
State Attorneys,
Public Defenders 10.30% 10.04%
23
Elected Officers' Class—
Justices, Judges 15.54% 15.62%
24
Elected Officers' Class—
County Elected Officers 11.45% 11.79%
25
Senior Management Service Class 8.68% 8.73%
26
DROP 9.43% 9.37%
27
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5205-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5205 2026
28 (5) In order to address unfunded actuarial liabilities of
29 the system, the required employer retirement contribution rates
30 for each membership class and subclass of the Florida Retirement
31 System for both retirement plans are as follows:
32
Percentage of
Gross
Compensation,
Effective
Membership Class July 1, 2026 2025
33
34
Regular Class 4.42% 4.87%
35
Special Risk Class 12.60% 13.03%
36
Special Risk
Administrative
Support Class 27.11% 26.54%
37
Elected Officers' Class—
Legislators, Governor,
Lt. Governor,
Cabinet Officers, 51.43% 50.56%
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5205-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5205 2026
State Attorneys,
Public Defenders
38
Elected Officers' Class—
Justices, Judges 28.40% 28.46%
39
Elected Officers' Class—
County Elected Officers 41.49% 40.72%
40
Senior Management Service Class 21.86% 22.45%
41
DROP 10.20% 10.65%
42
43 Section 2. The Legislature finds that a proper and
44 legitimate state purpose is served when employees, officers, and
45 retirees of the state and its political subdivisions, and the
46 dependents, survivors, and beneficiaries of such employees,
47 officers, and retirees, are extended the basic protections
48 afforded by governmental retirement systems. These persons must
49 be provided benefits that are fair and adequate and that are
50 managed, administered, and funded in an actuarially sound manner
51 as required by s. 14, Article X of the State Constitution and
52 part VII of chapter 112, Florida Statutes. Therefore, the
53 Legislature determines and declares that this act fulfills an
54 important state interest.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5205-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5205 2026
55 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5205-00